02_Morphology/chv.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>                   ! Noun
%<pl%>                  ! Plural
%<nom%>                 ! Nominative
%<ins%>                 ! Instrumental
%<gen%>                 ! Genetive
%<abl%>                 ! Ablative

%<Der_лӑх%>             ! -лӑх derivational suffix (N -> N)

%>                      ! Morpheme boundary

%{A%}                   ! Archiphoneme [а] or [е]
%{М%}                   ! Archiphoneme [м] or [0]
%{Ӑ%}                   ! Archiphoneme [ӑ] or [ӗ] or [0]
%{ъ%}                   ! pseudo back vowel [0]

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;

LEXICON CASES

%<nom%>:%>       # ;    ! nominative
%<gen%>:%>%{Ӑ%}н # ;    ! genetive
%<ins%>:%>п%{A%} # ;    ! instrumental

LEXICON PLURAL

                 CASES ; ! ¬ plural
%<pl%>:%>се%{М%} CASES ; ! plural

LEXICON SUBST

PLURAL ;

LEXICON DER-N

%<Der_лӑх%>:%>л%{Ӑ%}х SUBST "weight: 1.0" ;

LEXICON N

%<n%>: SUBST ;
%<n%>: DER-N ;

LEXICON Nouns

урам:урам N ;                   ! "street"
пахча:пахча N ;                 ! "garden"
хула:хула N ;                   ! "city"
канаш:канаш N ;                 ! "council"
тӗс:тӗс N ;                     ! "aspect"
патша:патша N ;                 ! "tsar, king, caesar or something"
куҫ:куҫ N ;                     ! "eye"
патшалӑх:патшалӑх N ;           ! "state"
специалист:специалист%{ъ%} N ;  ! "specialist"
